node_0
the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
the mouse Dazap1 gene : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
its : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
its : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
mouse genes : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
Dazap1 : Dazap1 is expressed throughout testis development.
the mouse Dazap1 gene : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
its : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
Dazap1 :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
The mouse : The mouse and the human genes have very similar structures, consisting of 12 exons spanning about 28 kb.
the Mouse : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
the mouse Dazap1 gene : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
Dazap1 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Dazap1 : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
Dazap1 : The expression of both Dazl1 and Dazap1 persisted throughout testes development, in both the prenatal and postnatal periods.
Dazap1 : However, only Dazap1 was expressed in a mouse germ cell line GCl-spg [19] and a Sertoli cell line MT4.
Dazap1 : The results suggest that Dazap1 is expressed in both somatic and germ cells in the testis.
Dazap1 : Figure 2  Expression of Dazap1 in adult mouse tissues.
Dazap1 : Dazap1 is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
Dazap1 : The genomic structure of Dazap1, delineated here, should facilitate the generating of Dazap1 null mutation.
Dazap1 : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
mouse Dazap1 : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
the gene : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
Dazap1 : The primers were prdap35: agctcagggagtacttcaaga and prdap24 :ggagcttgattcttgctgtcc for Dazap1 which generated a product of 211 bp, and prdaz71: atcgaactggtgtgtcgaagg and prdaz72: ggaggctgcatgtaagtctca for Dazl1 which generated a product of 245 bp.
node_2
mouse : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
mouse : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
mouse : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
mouse : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
mouse : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
mouse : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
mouse : More recently, DAZL was shown both in vitro and in a yeast three-hybrid system to bind specifically to oligo(U) stretches interspersed by G or C residues, including a U-rich segment in the 5' UTR of mouse Cdc25C mRNA [13].  
mouse : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
mouse :  Results  Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 cDNA  
Mouse : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
mouse : The mouse and the human proteins differ in 9 amino acids only, with 7 substitutions and two deletions/insertions.
mouse : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
mouse : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
mouse : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
mouse :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
mouse : The mouse and the human genes have very similar structures, consisting of 12 exons spanning about 28 kb.
Mouse : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
mouse : GenBank accession numbers for mouse and human cDNAs are AF225910 and AF181719, respectively.
mouse : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
mouse : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
mouse : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
mouse : However, only Dazap1 was expressed in a mouse germ cell line GCl-spg [19] and a Sertoli cell line MT4.
mouse : Figure 2  Expression of Dazap1 in adult mouse tissues.
mouse : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
mouse : Figure 3  Developmental expression of Dazap1 and Dazl in mouse testes.
mouse : GC1 and MT4 are mouse germ cell and Sertoli cell lines, respectively, and gDNA is mouse genomic DNA.
mouse : GC1 and MT4 are mouse germ cell and Sertoli cell lines, respectively, and gDNA is mouse genomic DNA.
mouse : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
mouse : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
mouse : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
mouse :  Figure 5  Western blot analyses of the expression of DAZAP1 and DAZL in mouse testes during postnatal development.
mouse :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
mouse : Similar analyses showed that a majority of DAZAP1 in adult mouse testes was also present in the cytoplasmic fraction (data not shown).
mouse : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
mouse : In mouse testes, DAZAP1 was found both in the nuclei and in the cytoplasm.
mouse :  Isolation of mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones  
mouse : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
mouse : The 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15], using prdap11 (ttgcgggccatatccttg, #749–732) as the primer for cDNA synthesis from mouse testis RNA, and prdap37 (ttgttgccacgtgggcg, #734–718) and an adaptor primer as the primers for PCR amplification.
mouse : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
mouse : These primers amplified a 271 bp fragment from mouse but not hamster genomic DNA.
mouse : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
mouse : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
mouse :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
mouse : An oligopeptide containing the last 19 ammo acid residues of the mouse DAZAP1 was synthesized in vitro using the services of Bethyl Laboratories (Montgomery, TX).
Mouse : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
mouse :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
mouse :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
node_4
an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
protein product : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
node_6
infertility : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
infertility : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
infertility : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
infertility : It contains no known mutant alleles that are associated with infertility.
node_8
infertility factors DAZ : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
infertility factors DAZ : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
DAZ : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
Deleted in Azoospermia : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZ : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
DAZ : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
DAZ : Deletion of the DAZ genes is found in about 10% of infertile males with idiopathic azoospermia [2], and disruption of Dazl1 causes infertility in both male and female mice [6].
DAZ : Mutations in the DAZ family members of Drosophila[7], C. elegans[8], and Xenopus[9] also affect the fertility in either males, females, or both sexes.
DAZ :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
DAZ : DAZ and DAZL are expressed in the nucleus and cytoplasm of primordial germ cells and spermatogonia, and in the cytoplasm of meiotic spermatocytes [6,10].
DAZ : Genetic and biochemical studies suggest a role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation.
DAZ : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
DAZ : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
DAZ : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
node_10
infertility factors : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
infertility factors : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
DAZL : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
DAZL : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
DAZL : DAZ and DAZL are expressed in the nucleus and cytoplasm of primordial germ cells and spermatogonia, and in the cytoplasm of meiotic spermatocytes [6,10].
DAZL : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
DAZL : More recently, DAZL was shown both in vitro and in a yeast three-hybrid system to bind specifically to oligo(U) stretches interspersed by G or C residues, including a U-rich segment in the 5' UTR of mouse Cdc25C mRNA [13].  
DAZL : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
DAZL :  Figure 5  Western blot analyses of the expression of DAZAP1 and DAZL in mouse testes during postnatal development.
DAZL : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
DAZL : The presence of DAZAP1 and DAZL in each fractions was analyzed by Western blotting.
DAZL : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
DAZL : For example, DAZAP1 could be involved in the transport of the mRNAs of the target genes of DAZL.
DAZL : Alternatively, DAZL and DAZAP1 may act antagonistically to regulate the timing and the level of expression.
DAZL : DAZAP1 could function in a similar manner by binding to DAZL and inhibiting its function.
its : DAZAP1 could function in a similar manner by binding to DAZL and inhibiting its function.
node_12
Background : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
Background : Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene encoding an RNA-binding protein that interacts with infertility factors DAZ and DAZL  Abstract  Background  
Background :  Background  
node_14
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
its : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZAP1 : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
DAZAP1 : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
its : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
DAZAP1 : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
DAZAP1 : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
DAZAP1 :  Conclusions  DAZAP1 is evolutionarily highly conserved.
Its : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
Its : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
it : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
DAZAP1 : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
it : The absence of DAZAP1 from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in protein synthesis.
Its : Its natural substrates have not been identified.
It : It is present at variable levels in many tissues.
Its : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
Its : Its absence from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
it : Its absence from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
node_15
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZ Associated Protein 1 : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
node_18
yeast : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
yeast : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
yeast : More recently, DAZL was shown both in vitro and in a yeast three-hybrid system to bind specifically to oligo(U) stretches interspersed by G or C residues, including a U-rich segment in the 5' UTR of mouse Cdc25C mRNA [13].  
yeast : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
node_23
DAZ : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZ : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
a putative male infertility factor : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
node_25
Deleted in Azoospermia : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
Deleted in Azoospermia : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
DAZ : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
node_27
Azoospermia : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
Azoospermia : DAZAP1 (DAZ Associated Protein 1) was originally identified by a yeast two-hybrid system through its interaction with a putative male infertility factor, DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia).
Azoospermia : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
node_30
the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
node_33
DAZL : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
DAZL : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein : In vitro, DAZAP1 interacts with both the Y chromosome-encoded DAZ and an autosome-encoded DAZ-like protein, DAZL.
node_36
two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
the RBDs : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
The two RBDs : The two RBDs are especially highly conserved.
They : They share 98% and 97% similarity and 97% and 92% identity, respectively, between DAZAP1 and Prrp.
The two RNA binding domains : The two RNA binding domains are boxed.
The two RBDs : The two RBDs are encoded by exons 1–4 and 5–8, respectively.
the RBDs of DAZAP1 : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
node_38
RNA-binding domains : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
RNA-binding domains : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
RBDs : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
node_42
the testis : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
the testis : DAZAP1 contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDs) and a proline-rich C-terminal portion, and is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
testis : Dazap1 is expressed throughout testis development.
the testis : Western blot detects a single 45 kD DAZAP1 protein that is most abundant in the testis.
testes : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
testes : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
the testis : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
testes : The expression of both Dazl1 and Dazap1 persisted throughout testes development, in both the prenatal and postnatal periods.
the testis : The results suggest that Dazap1 is expressed in both somatic and germ cells in the testis.
the testis : Dazap1 is expressed most abundantly in the testis.
the testis : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
the testes : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
testes : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
node_48
we : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
we : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
we : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
We : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
our : We now report our characterization of the mouse Dazap1 gene and its protein product.
Our :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
We : We thank Gary Kuo for his involvement in the construction of Dazap1 expression vectors, and Ron Swerdloff's group for helpful discussion.
node_53
the subcellular localization of its protein product : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
the subcellular localization of its protein product : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
Its subcellular localization : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 : The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 suggests that it is not involved directly in mRNA translation.
Subcellular localization of DAZAP1 :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
node_56
its protein product : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
its protein product : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
The mouse : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
the : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
mouse DAZAP1 : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
the mouse DAZAP1 : An oligopeptide containing the last 19 ammo acid residues of the mouse DAZAP1 was synthesized in vitro using the services of Bethyl Laboratories (Montgomery, TX).
The peptide : The peptide was conjugated to KLH as carrier and injected into a goat.
node_58
Results : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
Results : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
Results :  Results  Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 cDNA  
The results : The results suggest that Dazap1 is expressed in both somatic and germ cells in the testis.
node_60
The human : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
The human : To understand the biological function of DAZAP1 and the significance of its interaction with DAZ and DAZL, we isolated and characterized the mouse Dazap1 gene, and studied its expression and the subcellular localization of its protein product.  Results  The human and mouse genes have similar genomic structures and map to syntenic chromosomal regions.
the human orthologue : The coding region shares 89% similarity with that of the human orthologue.
the human DAZAP1 gene : The genomic structure of the human DAZAP1 gene was also determined by blasting the human genome sequence at National Center for Biotechnology Information with the human DAZAP1 cDNA sequence.
the human genes : The mouse and the human genes have very similar structures, consisting of 12 exons spanning about 28 kb.
Human DAZAP1 genes : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
the human DAZAP1 gene : This region is syntenic to human 19p13.3 where the human DAZAP1 gene is located [14,17].
node_64
The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
their : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
The mouse and the human proteins : The mouse and the human proteins differ in 9 amino acids only, with 7 substitutions and two deletions/insertions.
The mammalian proteins : The mammalian proteins shares 89% similarity and 81% identity with Xenopus Prrp (for proline-rich RNA binding protein) [16].
node_68
human DAZAP1 proteins : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
human DAZAP1 proteins : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
the human proteins : The mouse and the human proteins differ in 9 amino acids only, with 7 substitutions and two deletions/insertions.
the human : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
the human DAZAP1 : This pattern of expression is similar to that of the human DAZAP1 (14).
node_72
Xenopus : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
Xenopus : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
Xenopus : Mutations in the DAZ family members of Drosophila[7], C. elegans[8], and Xenopus[9] also affect the fertility in either males, females, or both sexes.
Xenopus : The mammalian proteins shares 89% similarity and 81% identity with Xenopus Prrp (for proline-rich RNA binding protein) [16].
Xenopus : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
Xenopus : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
Xenopus : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
Xenopus : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
Xenopus : The Vg1 RNA encodes a member of the transforming growth factor-β family that is required for generating dorsal mesoderm at the blastula stage of Xenopus embryogenesis [25].
node_74
Xenopus orthologue Prrp : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
Xenopus orthologue Prrp : The mouse and human DAZAP1 proteins share 98% identity and their sequences are highly similar to the Xenopus orthologue Prrp, especially in the RBDs.
Xenopus Prrp : The mammalian proteins shares 89% similarity and 81% identity with Xenopus Prrp (for proline-rich RNA binding protein) [16].
Prrp : They share 98% and 97% similarity and 97% and 92% identity, respectively, between DAZAP1 and Prrp.
Prrp : The C-terminal proline-rich portions of DAZAP1 and Prrp are less conserved (81% similarity and 71% identity).
Prrp : There is an insertion of a 58 bp segment in Prrp cDNA that causes a change of reading frame and results in a shorter Prrp with a different C-terminal end sequence.
the Xenopus Prrp : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
Prrp : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
Prrp : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
Prrp : Prrp also interacts through its proline-rich domain with two microfilament-associated proteins profilin and Mena, which may facilitate the anchoring of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex.
its : Prrp also interacts through its proline-rich domain with two microfilament-associated proteins profilin and Mena, which may facilitate the anchoring of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex.
Prrp : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
Prrp : Further mapping of the RNA sequence within VLE that binds Prrp, and possibly DAZAP1, may help to identify the natural substrates of DAZAP1.
node_79
testis development : Dazap1 is expressed throughout testis development.
testis development : Dazap1 is expressed throughout testis development.
testes development : The expression of both Dazl1 and Dazap1 persisted throughout testes development, in both the prenatal and postnatal periods.
node_82
a majority of DAZAP1 : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
a majority of DAZAP1 : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
they : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
node_85
the cytoplasmic fraction : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
the cytoplasmic fraction : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
the cytoplasmic fraction : Similar analyses showed that a majority of DAZAP1 in adult mouse testes was also present in the cytoplasmic fraction (data not shown).
node_89
polyribosomes : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
polyribosomes : Although a majority of DAZAP1 is present in the cytoplasmic fraction, they are not associated with polyribosomes.
polyribosomes :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
polyribosomes : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
polyribosomes : Sucrose gradient analyses shows that DAZAP1 is not associated with polyribosomes.
polyribosomes : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
polyribosomes : The absence of DAZAP1 from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in protein synthesis.
the polyribosomes : Both FXR1P and FXR2P are associated with the polyribosomes [22].  
polyribosomes : Its absence from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
node_91
Conclusions :  Conclusions  DAZAP1 is evolutionarily highly conserved.
Conclusions :  Conclusions  DAZAP1 is evolutionarily highly conserved.
Conclusions : Conclusions  DAZAP1 is an evolutionarily conserved RNA-binding protein.
node_95
Its predominant expression in testes : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
Its predominant expression in testes : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
Its predominant expression in testes : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
node_98
spermatogenesis : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
spermatogenesis : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
Spermatogenesis : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
This process : This process is vital for the propagation of a species, and involves a large portion of the genome of an organism to ensure the quality and quantity of the final products.
spermatogenesis : Its predominant expression in testes suggests a role in spermatogenesis.
node_103
mRNA : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
mRNA : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
mRNA : Genetic and biochemical studies suggest a role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation.
mRNA : The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 suggests that it is not involved directly in mRNA translation.
mRNA :  Discussion  RNA-binding proteins have been found to participate in many cellular functions, including RNA transcription, pre-mRNA processing, mRNA transport, localization, translation and stability [20].
mRNA : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
mRNA : Its absence from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
node_105
mRNA translation : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
mRNA translation : Its subcellular localization indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
mRNA translation : Genetic and biochemical studies suggest a role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation.
mRNA translation : The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 suggests that it is not involved directly in mRNA translation.
mRNA translation : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
mRNA translation : Its absence from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in mRNA translation.
node_109
male germ cells : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
male germ cells : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
mature sperm : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
the final products : This process is vital for the propagation of a species, and involves a large portion of the genome of an organism to ensure the quality and quantity of the final products.
germ cells :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
germ cells : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
germ cells in the testis : The results suggest that Dazap1 is expressed in both somatic and germ cells in the testis.
germ cells : These proteins may act together to facilitate the expression of a set of genes in germ cells.
the germ cells : The spermatogenic defect in the male becomes apparent only after day 7 post partum when the germ cells are committing to meiosis (H. Cooke, personal communication).
node_111
germ : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
germ : Spermatogenesis is a complex developmental process in which male germ cells progress through mitotic proliferation, meiotic division and dramatic morphological changes to form mature sperm.
germ :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
germ : DAZ and DAZL are expressed in the nucleus and cytoplasm of primordial germ cells and spermatogonia, and in the cytoplasm of meiotic spermatocytes [6,10].
germ : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
germ : The results suggest that Dazap1 is expressed in both somatic and germ cells in the testis.
germ : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
germ : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
germ : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
germ : These proteins may act together to facilitate the expression of a set of genes in germ cells.
germ : The spermatogenic defect in the male becomes apparent only after day 7 post partum when the germ cells are committing to meiosis (H. Cooke, personal communication).
node_117
Drosophila : It is estimated that mutations in up to 11% of all genes in Drosophila might lead to male sterility [1].
Drosophila : It is estimated that mutations in up to 11% of all genes in Drosophila might lead to male sterility [1].
Drosophila : Mutations in the DAZ family members of Drosophila[7], C. elegans[8], and Xenopus[9] also affect the fertility in either males, females, or both sexes.
Drosophila : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
node_119
male sterility : It is estimated that mutations in up to 11% of all genes in Drosophila might lead to male sterility [1].
male sterility : It is estimated that mutations in up to 11% of all genes in Drosophila might lead to male sterility [1].
infertility in men : This is likely to be true for humans also, considering the extremely high incidence (4–5%) of infertility in men [2].
male infertility : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
node_123
the DAZ : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
the DAZ : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
Deleted in Azoospermia : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
node_125
the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family : Among the genes associated with male infertility is the DAZ (Deleted in Azoospermia) gene family.
The family : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
The DAZ gene family :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
the DAZ family : Genetic and biochemical studies suggest a role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation.
the DAZ gene family : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
its : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
the DAZ family : A role for the DAZ family in the regulation of mRNA translation is supported by lines of circumstantial evidence, including the association of DAZL with polyribosomes [12].
node_133
the autosomal DAZL1 : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
the autosomal DAZL1 : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
DAZ-like 1 : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
node_136
BOULE genes : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
BOULE genes : The family includes the Y-linked DAZ genes that are present only in great apes and old world monkeys [3], and the autosomal DAZL1 (DAZ-like 1) and BOULE genes [4,5] in all mammals.
BOULE : BOULE is expressed later, in the cytoplasm of pachytene spermatocytes [5].
node_139
Dazl1 : Deletion of the DAZ genes is found in about 10% of infertile males with idiopathic azoospermia [2], and disruption of Dazl1 causes infertility in both male and female mice [6].
Dazl1 : Deletion of the DAZ genes is found in about 10% of infertile males with idiopathic azoospermia [2], and disruption of Dazl1 causes infertility in both male and female mice [6].
Dazl1 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
Dazl1 : The expression of both Dazl1 and Dazap1 persisted throughout testes development, in both the prenatal and postnatal periods.
Dazl1 : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
Dazl1 : Comparing the phenotypes of Dazl1 and Dazap1 single and double knock-out mice may provide some clues to the significance of their interaction.
Dazl1 : Dazl1 knock-out mice have already been generated and studied [6].
Dazl1 : The primers were prdap35: agctcagggagtacttcaaga and prdap24 :ggagcttgattcttgctgtcc for Dazap1 which generated a product of 211 bp, and prdaz71: atcgaactggtgtgtcgaagg and prdaz72: ggaggctgcatgtaagtctca for Dazl1 which generated a product of 245 bp.
node_141
male : Deletion of the DAZ genes is found in about 10% of infertile males with idiopathic azoospermia [2], and disruption of Dazl1 causes infertility in both male and female mice [6].
male : Deletion of the DAZ genes is found in about 10% of infertile males with idiopathic azoospermia [2], and disruption of Dazl1 causes infertility in both male and female mice [6].
the male : The spermatogenic defect in the male becomes apparent only after day 7 post partum when the germ cells are committing to meiosis (H. Cooke, personal communication).
node_149
RNA :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
RNA :  The DAZ gene family encodes RNA binding proteins that are expressed specifically in germ cells.
RNA : It encodes a protein with two RNA binding domains and a proline rich C-terminal portion.
RNA : It also bound to RNA homopolymers.
RNA : The mammalian proteins shares 89% similarity and 81% identity with Xenopus Prrp (for proline-rich RNA binding protein) [16].
RNA : These proteins may therefore have a similar RNA binding specificity.
RNA : The two RNA binding domains are boxed.
RNA :  Discussion  RNA-binding proteins have been found to participate in many cellular functions, including RNA transcription, pre-mRNA processing, mRNA transport, localization, translation and stability [20].
RNA :  DAZAP1 was shown to bind RNA homopolymers in vitro, with a preference for poly U and poly G.
RNA : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
RNA : Further mapping of the RNA sequence within VLE that binds Prrp, and possibly DAZAP1, may help to identify the natural substrates of DAZAP1.
node_158
meiotic spermatocytes : DAZ and DAZL are expressed in the nucleus and cytoplasm of primordial germ cells and spermatogonia, and in the cytoplasm of meiotic spermatocytes [6,10].
meiotic spermatocytes : DAZ and DAZL are expressed in the nucleus and cytoplasm of primordial germ cells and spermatogonia, and in the cytoplasm of meiotic spermatocytes [6,10].
meiotic germ cells : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
node_167
Twine : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
Twine : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
node_171
mouse testes : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
mouse testes : Drosophila Boule mutants was defective in the translation of the meiosis-specific CDC25 homologue, Twine [11], and DAZL was found to be associated with polyribosomes in mouse testes [12].
mouse testes : Figure 3  Developmental expression of Dazap1 and Dazl in mouse testes.
mouse testes : In mouse testes, DAZAP1 was found both in the nuclei and in the cytoplasm.
node_181
two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
them : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
node_184
DAZ associated proteins : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
DAZ associated proteins : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
DAZAPs : In an attempt to elucidate the function of the DAZ gene family and to understanding the mechanisms of its action, we used a yeast two-hybrid system to isolate two human genes encoding DAZ associated proteins (DAZAPs) [14].
node_190
DAZAP1 : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
DAZAP1 : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
One of them : One of them, DAZAP1, is expressed predominantly in testes.
node_194
a protein with two RNA binding domains and a proline rich C-terminal portion : It encodes a protein with two RNA binding domains and a proline rich C-terminal portion.
a protein with two RNA binding domains and a proline rich C-terminal portion : It encodes a protein with two RNA binding domains and a proline rich C-terminal portion.
The DAZAP1 protein : The DAZAP1 protein interacted with both DAZ and DAZL in vitro.
It : It also bound to RNA homopolymers.
DAZAP1 : The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 suggests that it is not involved directly in mRNA translation.
it : The subcellular localization of DAZAP1 suggests that it is not involved directly in mRNA translation.
The DAZAP1 protein : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
It : It is highly conserved evolutionarily.
DAZAP1 : They share 98% and 97% similarity and 97% and 92% identity, respectively, between DAZAP1 and Prrp.
DAZAP1 : The C-terminal proline-rich portions of DAZAP1 and Prrp are less conserved (81% similarity and 71% identity).
the DAZAP1 proteins : Figure 1  Evolutionary conservation of the DAZAP1 proteins.
DAZAP1 : The genomic structure of the human DAZAP1 gene was also determined by blasting the human genome sequence at National Center for Biotechnology Information with the human DAZAP1 cDNA sequence.
DAZAP1 : The genomic structure of the human DAZAP1 gene was also determined by blasting the human genome sequence at National Center for Biotechnology Information with the human DAZAP1 cDNA sequence.
DAZAP1 : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
DAZAP1 : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
DAZAP1 : This region is syntenic to human 19p13.3 where the human DAZAP1 gene is located [14,17].
the DAZAP1 protein : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
DAZAP1 : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
DAZAP1 : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
DAZAP1 :  Figure 5  Western blot analyses of the expression of DAZAP1 and DAZL in mouse testes during postnatal development.
DAZAP1 :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
DAZAP1 : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
DAZAP1 : Sucrose gradient analyses shows that DAZAP1 is not associated with polyribosomes.
DAZAP1 : The presence of DAZAP1 and DAZL in each fractions was analyzed by Western blotting.
DAZAP1 : The absence of DAZAP1 from polyribosomes indicates that it is not directly involved in protein synthesis.
DAZAP1 : The significance of the interaction between DAZAP1 and DAZL/DAZ remains to be defined.
DAZAP1 : For example, DAZAP1 could be involved in the transport of the mRNAs of the target genes of DAZL.
DAZAP1 : Alternatively, DAZL and DAZAP1 may act antagonistically to regulate the timing and the level of expression.
DAZAP1 : DAZAP1 could function in a similar manner by binding to DAZL and inhibiting its function.
DAZAP1 :  DAZAP1 was shown to bind RNA homopolymers in vitro, with a preference for poly U and poly G.
DAZAP1 : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
DAZAP1 : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
DAZAP1 : Further mapping of the RNA sequence within VLE that binds Prrp, and possibly DAZAP1, may help to identify the natural substrates of DAZAP1.
DAZAP1 : Further mapping of the RNA sequence within VLE that binds Prrp, and possibly DAZAP1, may help to identify the natural substrates of DAZAP1.
DAZAP1 : Conclusions  DAZAP1 is an evolutionarily conserved RNA-binding protein.
DAZAP1 : In mouse testes, DAZAP1 was found both in the nuclei and in the cytoplasm.
DAZAP1 : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
DAZAP1 : The blot was hybridized sequentially with DAZAP1 and β-actin cDNA probes, with stripping of the bound probes in between.
DAZAP1 : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
DAZAP1 : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_200
RNA homopolymers : It also bound to RNA homopolymers.
RNA homopolymers : It also bound to RNA homopolymers.
RNA homopolymers :  DAZAP1 was shown to bind RNA homopolymers in vitro, with a preference for poly U and poly G.
node_214
the mouse Dazap1 cDNA :  Results  Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 cDNA  
the mouse Dazap1 cDNA :  Results  Characterization of the mouse Dazap1 cDNA  
the cDNA : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
the cDNA : The 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15], using prdap11 (ttgcgggccatatccttg, #749–732) as the primer for cDNA synthesis from mouse testis RNA, and prdap37 (ttgttgccacgtgggcg, #734–718) and an adaptor primer as the primers for PCR amplification.
node_218
Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
cDNA clones : Only the shorter transcript has been isolated in cDNA clones.
mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones :  Isolation of mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones  
Dazap1 cDNA clones : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
Dazap1 clones : Dazap1 clones were identified by colony hybridization and sequenced.
node_221
5' RACE : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
5' RACE : Mouse Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated by library screening, and the 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15].
5' RACE : The 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15], using prdap11 (ttgcgggccatatccttg, #749–732) as the primer for cDNA synthesis from mouse testis RNA, and prdap37 (ttgttgccacgtgggcg, #734–718) and an adaptor primer as the primers for PCR amplification.
node_223
untranslated region : The near fall length cDNA consists of a 53 bp 5' untranslated region (UTR), an open reading frame for a protein of 405 amino acid residues, and a 362 bp 3' UTR (GenBank Accession No: AF225910).
untranslated region : The near fall length cDNA consists of a 53 bp 5' untranslated region (UTR), an open reading frame for a protein of 405 amino acid residues, and a 362 bp 3' UTR (GenBank Accession No: AF225910).
UTR : The near fall length cDNA consists of a 53 bp 5' untranslated region (UTR), an open reading frame for a protein of 405 amino acid residues, and a 362 bp 3' UTR (GenBank Accession No: AF225910).
node_226
a protein of 405 amino acid residues : The near fall length cDNA consists of a 53 bp 5' untranslated region (UTR), an open reading frame for a protein of 405 amino acid residues, and a 362 bp 3' UTR (GenBank Accession No: AF225910).
a protein of 405 amino acid residues : The near fall length cDNA consists of a 53 bp 5' untranslated region (UTR), an open reading frame for a protein of 405 amino acid residues, and a 362 bp 3' UTR (GenBank Accession No: AF225910).
The mouse : The mouse and the human proteins differ in 9 amino acids only, with 7 substitutions and two deletions/insertions.
node_229
The 3' UTR sequence : The 3' UTR sequence is remarkably conserved.
The 3' UTR sequence : The 3' UTR sequence is remarkably conserved.
It : It contains three segments of 35 bp, 133 bp and 90 bp that share 85%, 90%, and 97% similarity with segments in the human 3' UTR, respectively.
node_232
three segments of 35 bp, 133 bp and 90 bp that share 85%, 90%, and 97% similarity with segments in the human 3' UTR : It contains three segments of 35 bp, 133 bp and 90 bp that share 85%, 90%, and 97% similarity with segments in the human 3' UTR, respectively.
three segments of 35 bp, 133 bp and 90 bp that share 85%, 90%, and 97% similarity with segments in the human 3' UTR : It contains three segments of 35 bp, 133 bp and 90 bp that share 85%, 90%, and 97% similarity with segments in the human 3' UTR, respectively.
These segments : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
node_237
RNA-binding domains : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
RNA-binding domains : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
RBDS : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
node_240
a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
The C-terminal proline-rich portions of DAZAP1 : The C-terminal proline-rich portions of DAZAP1 and Prrp are less conserved (81% similarity and 71% identity).
the C-terminal proline-rich portion : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
the C-terminus : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_242
Figure : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
Figure : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
Figure : Figure 1  Evolutionary conservation of the DAZAP1 proteins.
Figure : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Figure : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
Figure : Figure 2  Expression of Dazap1 in adult mouse tissues.
Figure : Figure 3  Developmental expression of Dazap1 and Dazl in mouse testes.
Figure : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
Figure : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
Figure : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
Figure :  Figure 5  Western blot analyses of the expression of DAZAP1 and DAZL in mouse testes during postnatal development.
Figure : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
Figure :  Figure 6  
node_244
Figure 1 : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
Figure 1 : These segments probably contain regulatory elements.  The DAZAP1 protein contains two RNA-binding domains (RBDS) and a C-terminal portion that is rich in proline (Figure 1).
Figure 1 : Figure 1  Evolutionary conservation of the DAZAP1 proteins.
node_258
DAZAP1 and Prrp : They share 98% and 97% similarity and 97% and 92% identity, respectively, between DAZAP1 and Prrp.
DAZAP1 and Prrp : They share 98% and 97% similarity and 97% and 92% identity, respectively, between DAZAP1 and Prrp.
These proteins : These proteins may therefore have a similar RNA binding specificity.
DAZAP1 and Prrp : The C-terminal proline-rich portions of DAZAP1 and Prrp are less conserved (81% similarity and 71% identity).
DAZAP1 and Prrp : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
these proteins : Sequence conservation between the RBDs of DAZAP1 and Prrp suggests that these proteins may bind to similar RNA sequences.
node_273
The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
the human and the mouse sequences : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
node_274
The amino acid sequences of the : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
The amino acid sequences of the : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
the mouse sequences : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
the mouse : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
node_275
The amino acid sequences of the human : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
The amino acid sequences of the human : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
the human : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
node_279
The amino acid sequences of the : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
The amino acid sequences of the : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
the mouse and Xenopus sequences : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
node_280
The amino acid sequences of : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
The amino acid sequences of : The amino acid sequences of the human and mouse DAZAP1s and the Xenopus Prrp are compared.
Xenopus sequences : Differences between the human and the mouse sequences, and between the mouse and Xenopus sequences are marked by #'s and *'s, respectively.
node_299
Genomic structure of Dazap1 :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
Genomic structure of Dazap1 :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
The genomic structure of Dazap1 : The genomic structure of Dazap1, delineated here, should facilitate the generating of Dazap1 null mutation.
node_302
chromosomal mapping :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
chromosomal mapping :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1 : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
node_305
mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences :  Genomic structure of Dazap1 and chromosomal mapping  Several overlapping lambda clones containing mouse Dazap1 genomic sequences were isolated.
mouse : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
node_307
exons : The locations of exons were determined by PCR amplification across exon-intron boundaries following by sequencing.
exons : The locations of exons were determined by PCR amplification across exon-intron boundaries following by sequencing.
exon : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
node_309
PCR : The locations of exons were determined by PCR amplification across exon-intron boundaries following by sequencing.
PCR : The locations of exons were determined by PCR amplification across exon-intron boundaries following by sequencing.
PCR : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
PCR : The PCR primers span over introns and produce much larger (if any) fragments from genomic DNA.  
PCR : The 5' end of the cDNA was isolated by 5' RACE [15], using prdap11 (ttgcgggccatatccttg, #749–732) as the primer for cDNA synthesis from mouse testis RNA, and prdap37 (ttgttgccacgtgggcg, #734–718) and an adaptor primer as the primers for PCR amplification.
PCR : The PCR products were cloned into a TA cloning vector pCR2.1-TOPO (Invitrogen, Carlsbad CA).
PCR : PCR primers (prdap25: cacctccaggatgtgttagc and prdazp26:gtcaccaagggtgtctgaag) were designed from intronic sequences flanking Dazap1 exon 8.
PCR : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
node_314
The mouse and the human genes : The mouse and the human genes have very similar structures, consisting of 12 exons spanning about 28 kb.
The mouse and the human genes : The mouse and the human genes have very similar structures, consisting of 12 exons spanning about 28 kb.
the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
node_319
intron : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
intron : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
Introns : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
introns : The PCR primers span over introns and produce much larger (if any) fragments from genomic DNA.  
intron : Both primer pairs annealed across intron insertion sites.
node_321
Table : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
Table : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
Table : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
node_323
Table 1 : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
Table 1 : All intron insertion sites are conserved (Table 1).
Table 1 : Table 1  Exon-intron Organization of the Mouse and Human DAZAP1 genes  a: Introns are inserted after the indicated nucleotide positions of DAZAP1 cDNA sequences.
node_336
A pair of PCR primers : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
A pair of PCR primers : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
The PCR primers : The PCR primers span over introns and produce much larger (if any) fragments from genomic DNA.  
node_339
Dazap1 : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
Dazap1 : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
Dazap1 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Dazap1 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
Dazap1 : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
Dazap1 : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
Dazap1 : The genomic structure of Dazap1, delineated here, should facilitate the generating of Dazap1 null mutation.
Dazap1 : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
Dazap1 : Dazap1 clones were identified by colony hybridization and sequenced.
Dazap1 : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
Dazap1 : PCR primers (prdap25: cacctccaggatgtgttagc and prdazp26:gtcaccaagggtgtctgaag) were designed from intronic sequences flanking Dazap1 exon 8.
Dazap1 :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
Dazap1 : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
Dazap1 : We thank Gary Kuo for his involvement in the construction of Dazap1 expression vectors, and Ron Swerdloff's group for helpful discussion.
node_343
hamster : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
hamster : A pair of PCR primers was designed from Dazap1 intronic sequences that amplified mouse but not hamster genomic sequences.
hamster : These primers amplified a 271 bp fragment from mouse but not hamster genomic DNA.
hamster : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
node_347
27.84 cR from D10Mit260 : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
27.84 cR from D10Mit260 : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
This region : This region is syntenic to human 19p13.3 where the human DAZAP1 gene is located [14,17].
It : It contains no known mutant alleles that are associated with infertility.
node_349
data : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
data : Using a panel of mouse-hamster radiation hybrids, the mouse Dazap1 gene was mapped to chromosome 10 placed 27.84 cR from D10Mit260 (lod > 3.0) (data not shown).
data : Both antibodies recognized in vitro synthesized DAZAP1 in an immunoprecipitation assay (data not shown).
data : Similar analyses showed that a majority of DAZAP1 in adult mouse testes was also present in the cytoplasmic fraction (data not shown).
node_356
Expression of Dazap1 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Expression of Dazap1 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
The expression of : The expression of both Dazl1 and Dazap1 persisted throughout testes development, in both the prenatal and postnatal periods.
node_359
adult mouse tissues : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
adult mouse tissues : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
adult mouse tissues : Figure 2  Expression of Dazap1 in adult mouse tissues.
adult mouse tissues : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
node_362
two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Dazap1 transcripts : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
Dazap1 transcripts :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
node_366
Figure 2 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Figure 2 : Expression of Dazap1  Northern analyses of adult mouse tissues showed the presence of two Dazap1 transcripts of 1.75 kb and 2.4 kb, respectively (Figure 2).
Figure 2 : Figure 2  Expression of Dazap1 in adult mouse tissues.
node_372
liver : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
liver : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
liver : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
node_374
brain : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
brain : Dazap1 was expressed most abundantly in the testis, much less in liver, heart and brain, and even less in other tissues.
brain : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
node_376
expression : This pattern of expression is similar to that of the human DAZAP1 (14).
expression : This pattern of expression is similar to that of the human DAZAP1 (14).
expression : Alternatively, DAZL and DAZAP1 may act antagonistically to regulate the timing and the level of expression.
expression : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_379
RT-PCR : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
RT-PCR : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
RT-PCR : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction :  Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) was carried out as preciously described using an annealing temperature of 54°C [27].
node_382
embryonic day 15 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
embryonic day 15 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
day 15 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
node_386
Figure 3 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
Figure 3 : RT-PCR analyses showed that Dazap1 mRNA was already present in fetal testes at embryonic day 15, similar to Dazl1 mRNA (Figure 3).
Figure 3 : Figure 3  Developmental expression of Dazap1 and Dazl in mouse testes.
node_396
testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
Wv/Wv testes : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
node_398
diminished number of germ cells : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
diminished number of germ cells : Dazl1 and Dazap1 transcripts were also present in the testes of Wv/Wv mutant mice which contained diminished number of germ cells [18].
diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
node_404
a Sertoli cell line MT4 : However, only Dazap1 was expressed in a mouse germ cell line GCl-spg [19] and a Sertoli cell line MT4.
a Sertoli cell line MT4 : However, only Dazap1 was expressed in a mouse germ cell line GCl-spg [19] and a Sertoli cell line MT4.
MT4 : GC1 and MT4 are mouse germ cell and Sertoli cell lines, respectively, and gDNA is mouse genomic DNA.
node_417
a Dazap1 cDNA probe : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
a Dazap1 cDNA probe : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
DAZAP1 : The blot was hybridized sequentially with DAZAP1 and β-actin cDNA probes, with stripping of the bound probes in between.
node_420
a β-actin probe : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
a β-actin probe : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
β-actin cDNA probes : The blot was hybridized sequentially with DAZAP1 and β-actin cDNA probes, with stripping of the bound probes in between.
node_422
β-actin : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
β-actin : A mouse multiple-tissue Northern blot was hybridized with a Dazap1 cDNA probe, stripped, and rehybridized with a β-actin probe.
β-actin : The blot was hybridized sequentially with DAZAP1 and β-actin cDNA probes, with stripping of the bound probes in between.
node_432
day 15 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
day 15 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
El 5 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
node_435
day 17 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
day 17 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
El 7 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
node_438
new born mice : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
new born mice : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
Day 0 : RT-PCR was performed on total testicular RNAs isolated from day 15 (El 5) and day 17 (El 7) embryos, new born mice (Day 0), and mice at various days after birth.
node_445
White spotted : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
White spotted : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
W : Wv/Wv testes contain diminished germ cell population due to a mutated W (White spotted) gene.
node_449
gDNA : GC1 and MT4 are mouse germ cell and Sertoli cell lines, respectively, and gDNA is mouse genomic DNA.
gDNA : GC1 and MT4 are mouse germ cell and Sertoli cell lines, respectively, and gDNA is mouse genomic DNA.
genomic DNA : The PCR primers span over introns and produce much larger (if any) fragments from genomic DNA.  
mouse : These primers amplified a 271 bp fragment from mouse but not hamster genomic DNA.
node_456
the expression of the DAZAP1 protein : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
the expression of the DAZAP1 protein : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
The expression of DAZAP1 : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
node_459
two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 : To study the expression of the DAZAP1 protein, two antibodies against mouse DAZAP1 were generated.
Both antibodies : Both antibodies recognized in vitro synthesized DAZAP1 in an immunoprecipitation assay (data not shown).
anti-DAZAP1 antibodies : Generation of anti-DAZAP1 antibodies  
Antibodies : Antibodies were generated against both a recombinant protein produced in E. coli and an oligopeptide synthesized in vitro.
antibodies : After incubation with horseradish peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies, the binding of antibodies was detected using the ECL Western Blotting System (Amersham Pharmacia Biotech, Piscataway, NJ).
node_463
The anti DAZAP1-C antibody : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
The anti DAZAP1-C antibody : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
the anti-DAZAPl-C antibody : The proteins were mixed with Freund's adjuvant and injected into rabbits to generate the anti-DAZAPl-C antibody.
the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody : About 50 μg of tissue extracts were separated on 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels and blotted with either the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody (at a 1/2,000 dilution) or the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody (at a 1/5,000 dilution).
node_466
the anti DAZAP1-P antibody : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
the anti DAZAP1-P antibody : The anti DAZAP1-C antibody was raised against a recombinant protein containing the C-terminal proline-rich portion, and the anti DAZAP1-P antibody was raised against an oligopeptide containing the last 19 amino acid residue at the C-terminus.
the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody : Equal amounts of total protein from various tissue extracts were applied to a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and western blotted with the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody.
The anti-DAZAP1-P antibody : The anti-DAZAP1-P antibody thus produced was purified on an affinity column containing the oligopeptide antigen.
the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody : About 50 μg of tissue extracts were separated on 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels and blotted with either the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody (at a 1/2,000 dilution) or the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody (at a 1/5,000 dilution).
node_472
mouse tissue extracts : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
mouse tissue extracts : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
the tissue extracts : Protein concentration of the tissue extracts was determined by the Bradford method using the Bio-Rad Protein Assay system (Bio-Rad, Hercules, CA).
tissue extracts : About 50 μg of tissue extracts were separated on 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels and blotted with either the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody (at a 1/2,000 dilution) or the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody (at a 1/5,000 dilution).
node_474
a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
The protein : The protein was also present in the ovary.
It : It is present at a low level in the testes of 6 days old mice which contained only primitive type A spermatogonia.
node_480
Figure 4 : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
Figure 4 : Western blotting of mouse tissue extracts detected a 45 kD protein that was present most abundantly in the testis, and to a lesser degree in spleen, liver, lung and brain (Figure 4).
Figure 4 : The expression of DAZAP1 increased afterward, as the testes contained increasing number of proliferating and meiotic germ cells.  Figure 4  Expression of the DAZAP1 protein in adult mouse tissues.
node_487
Figure 5 : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
Figure 5 : The expression of DAZAP1 during germ cell development paralleled that of DAZL (Figure 5).
Figure 5 :  Figure 5  Western blot analyses of the expression of DAZAP1 and DAZL in mouse testes during postnatal development.
node_499
tissue : Equal amounts of total protein from various tissue extracts were applied to a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and western blotted with the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody.
tissue : Equal amounts of total protein from various tissue extracts were applied to a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and western blotted with the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody.
tissue : Protein concentration of the tissue extracts was determined by the Bradford method using the Bio-Rad Protein Assay system (Bio-Rad, Hercules, CA).
tissue : About 50 μg of tissue extracts were separated on 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels and blotted with either the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody (at a 1/2,000 dilution) or the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody (at a 1/5,000 dilution).
node_501
a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel : Equal amounts of total protein from various tissue extracts were applied to a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and western blotted with the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody.
a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel : Equal amounts of total protein from various tissue extracts were applied to a 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and western blotted with the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody.
10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels : About 50 μg of tissue extracts were separated on 10% SDS-polyacrylamide gels and blotted with either the anti-DAZAP1-C antibody (at a 1/2,000 dilution) or the anti-DAZAP1-P antibody (at a 1/5,000 dilution).
node_513
mouse testis extracts :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
mouse testis extracts :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
mouse testis extracts : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
mouse testicular extracts :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
node_515
most DAZL :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
most DAZL :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
them :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
node_517
the post mitochondrial fraction :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
the post mitochondrial fraction :  Subcellular localization of DAZAP1  Our previous fractionation of mouse testis extracts showed that most DAZL were present in the post mitochondrial fraction, and some of them were associated with polyribosomes [12].
the post- mitochondria fraction : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
node_521
adult mouse testes : Similar analyses showed that a majority of DAZAP1 in adult mouse testes was also present in the cytoplasmic fraction (data not shown).
adult mouse testes : Similar analyses showed that a majority of DAZAP1 in adult mouse testes was also present in the cytoplasmic fraction (data not shown).
Adult mouse testes :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
node_531
Figure 6 : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
Figure 6 : However, sucrose gradient analyses of the post- mitochondria fraction showed that, unlike DAZL, DAZAP1 did not co-sediment with polyribosomes (Figure 6).
Figure 6 :  Figure 6  
node_537
The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
the supernatant : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
node_541
a 15–45% sucrose gradient : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
a 15–45% sucrose gradient : The post-mitochondrial supernatant of mouse testis extracts was analyzed on a 15–45% sucrose gradient.
15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
node_558
FXR1P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR1P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR1P : Both FXR1P and FXR2P are associated with the polyribosomes [22].  
node_560
FXR1P and FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR1P and FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
their : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
Both FXR1P and FXR2P : Both FXR1P and FXR2P are associated with the polyribosomes [22].  
node_561
FXR1P and FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR1P and FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
two RNA-binding proteins : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
node_563
FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR2P : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
FXR2P : Both FXR1P and FXR2P are associated with the polyribosomes [22].  
node_567
the fragile X mental retardation protein : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
the fragile X mental retardation protein : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein : This finding is different from two RNA-binding proteins, FXR1P and FXR2P, that were identified through their interaction with another polysomal-associated RNA-binding protein, the fragile X mental retardation protein [21].
node_582
Nova-1 : Such an antagonistic interaction between two interacting RNA-binding proteins is exemplified by the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein, Nova-1.
Nova-1 : Such an antagonistic interaction between two interacting RNA-binding proteins is exemplified by the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein, Nova-1.
Nova-1 : Nova-1 regulates the alternative splicing of the pre-mRNAs encoding neuronal inhibitory glycine receptor α2 (GlyR α2) [23].
Nova-1 : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
Nova-1 : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
its : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
node_583
Nova-1 : Such an antagonistic interaction between two interacting RNA-binding proteins is exemplified by the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein, Nova-1.
Nova-1 : Such an antagonistic interaction between two interacting RNA-binding proteins is exemplified by the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein, Nova-1.
the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein : Such an antagonistic interaction between two interacting RNA-binding proteins is exemplified by the neuron-specific nuclear RNA-binding protein, Nova-1.
node_586
glycine receptor α2 : Nova-1 regulates the alternative splicing of the pre-mRNAs encoding neuronal inhibitory glycine receptor α2 (GlyR α2) [23].
glycine receptor α2 : Nova-1 regulates the alternative splicing of the pre-mRNAs encoding neuronal inhibitory glycine receptor α2 (GlyR α2) [23].
GlyR α2 : Nova-1 regulates the alternative splicing of the pre-mRNAs encoding neuronal inhibitory glycine receptor α2 (GlyR α2) [23].
node_592
brPTB : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
brPTB : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
a second RNA-binding protein : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
node_594
brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
brPTB : The ability of Nova-1 to activate exon selection in neurons is antagonized by a second RNA-binding protein, brPTB (brain-enriched polypyrimidine tract-binding protein), which interacts with Nova-1 and inhibits its function [24].
node_603
Dazl1 : Comparing the phenotypes of Dazl1 and Dazap1 single and double knock-out mice may provide some clues to the significance of their interaction.
Dazl1 : Comparing the phenotypes of Dazl1 and Dazap1 single and double knock-out mice may provide some clues to the significance of their interaction.
Dazl1 knock-out mice : Dazl1 knock-out mice have already been generated and studied [6].
node_621
Prrp : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
Prrp : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1 : Recently, the Xenopus orthologue of DAZAP1, Prrp, was identified and characterized [16].
node_624
a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
This Vg1 localization element (VLE) : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
the 340 nt VLE sequence : However, a BLAST search of the GenBank for the 340 nt VLE sequence failed to identify any mammalian sequences with significant homology.
VLE : Further mapping of the RNA sequence within VLE that binds Prrp, and possibly DAZAP1, may help to identify the natural substrates of DAZAP1.
node_627
Xenopus Vg1 mRNA : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
Xenopus Vg1 mRNA : Prrp binds to a 340 nt sequence in the 3' UTR of Xenopus Vg1 mRNA.
Vg1 mRNA : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
Vg1 mRNA : Prrp also interacts through its proline-rich domain with two microfilament-associated proteins profilin and Mena, which may facilitate the anchoring of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex.
node_630
Vg1 localization element : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
Vg1 localization element : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
VLE : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
node_633
Vg1 : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
Vg1 : This Vg1 localization element (VLE) is sufficient for the migration and clustering of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex of mature oocyte.
Vg1 : Prrp also interacts through its proline-rich domain with two microfilament-associated proteins profilin and Mena, which may facilitate the anchoring of Vg1 mRNA to the vegetal cortex.
Vg1 : The Vg1 RNA encodes a member of the transforming growth factor-β family that is required for generating dorsal mesoderm at the blastula stage of Xenopus embryogenesis [25].
node_665
the nuclei : In mouse testes, DAZAP1 was found both in the nuclei and in the cytoplasm.
the nuclei : In mouse testes, DAZAP1 was found both in the nuclei and in the cytoplasm.
nuclei : Homogenates were centrifuged at 1,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet cell debris and nuclei.
node_677
CA : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
CA : Dazap1 cDNA clones were isolated from a mouse testis cDNA library (#937308, Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) using a human DAZAP1 cDNA as a probe.
CA : The PCR products were cloned into a TA cloning vector pCR2.1-TOPO (Invitrogen, Carlsbad CA).
CA :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
CA : Protein concentration of the tissue extracts was determined by the Bradford method using the Bio-Rad Protein Assay system (Bio-Rad, Hercules, CA).
node_689
Dazap1-C : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
Dazap1-C : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
a cDNA clone : The 5' RACE clone with the longest 5' UTR region and the cDNA clone P21 were ligated together through a unique PmlI site at # 722 to generate a cDNA clone (Dazap1-C) with a near full-length insert.  Chromosomal mapping of Dazap1  Dazap1 genomic clones were isolated from a mouse 129SV genomic library (#946305, Stragagene), and sequences flanking each exons were determined.
node_696
PCR primers : PCR primers (prdap25: cacctccaggatgtgttagc and prdazp26:gtcaccaagggtgtctgaag) were designed from intronic sequences flanking Dazap1 exon 8.
PCR primers : PCR primers (prdap25: cacctccaggatgtgttagc and prdazp26:gtcaccaagggtgtctgaag) were designed from intronic sequences flanking Dazap1 exon 8.
These primers : These primers amplified a 271 bp fragment from mouse but not hamster genomic DNA.
node_704
DNA : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
DNA : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
DNA : Sequences at the junctions were verified by DNA sequencing.
node_706
100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
the radiation hybrids : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
node_708
radiation : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
radiation : DNA samples of a panel of 100 radiation hybrids containing mouse chromosome fragments in a hamster background were purchased from Research Genetics (Huntsville, AL).
radiation : The presence of mouse Dazap1 in the radiation hybrids was determined by PCR and the results were sent to the MIT server  for computerized physical mapping of the gene.
node_720
a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot :  Expression of Dazap1 transcripts  Northern hybridization was carried out according to standard procedures [26] using a mouse Multiple Tissue Northern Blot #7762–1 from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA).
The blot : The blot was hybridized sequentially with DAZAP1 and β-actin cDNA probes, with stripping of the bound probes in between.
node_729
Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction :  Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) was carried out as preciously described using an annealing temperature of 54°C [27].
Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction :  Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) was carried out as preciously described using an annealing temperature of 54°C [27].
RT-PCR :  Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) was carried out as preciously described using an annealing temperature of 54°C [27].
node_737
an oligopeptide synthesized in vitro : Antibodies were generated against both a recombinant protein produced in E. coli and an oligopeptide synthesized in vitro.
an oligopeptide synthesized in vitro : Antibodies were generated against both a recombinant protein produced in E. coli and an oligopeptide synthesized in vitro.
the oligopeptide antigen : The anti-DAZAP1-P antibody thus produced was purified on an affinity column containing the oligopeptide antigen.
node_743
Novagen : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
Novagen : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
Novagen : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_745
Madison : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
Madison : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
Madison : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_747
WI : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
WI : The insert of a Dazap1 cDNA clone P21, which encoded the C-terminal portion of DAZAP1 (starting from aa #197), was cloned in-frame into the EcoRI/XhoI sites of an expression vector pET32b (Novagen, Madison, WI).
WI : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
node_750
fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 : Milligrams of fusion proteins between thioredoxin and DAZAP1 were prepared and purified on His-Bind metal chelation resins (Novagen, Madison, WI).
The proteins : The proteins were mixed with Freund's adjuvant and injected into rabbits to generate the anti-DAZAPl-C antibody.
node_764
Mouse tissues were homogenized : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
Mouse tissues were homogenized : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
The homogenized samples : The homogenized samples were cleared of debris by centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes.
node_766
the RIPA lysis buffer : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
the RIPA lysis buffer : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
buffer : Western blotting  Mouse tissues were homogenized in the RIPA lysis buffer (150 mM NaCl, 1.0% NP-40, 0.5% DOC, 0.1% SDS, 50 mM Tris, pH 8.0) at a concentration of 0.2 g tissue per ml of buffer.
node_770
10 minutes : The homogenized samples were cleared of debris by centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes.
10 minutes : The homogenized samples were cleared of debris by centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes.
10 minutes : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
node_785
20 mM Tris :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
20 mM Tris :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
20 mM Tris : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
node_787
100 mM KCl :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
100 mM KCl :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
100 mM KCl : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
node_789
5 mM MgCl2 :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
5 mM MgCl2 :  Fractionation of mouse testicular extracts  Adult mouse testes were homogenized in a buffer containing 20 mM Tris, pH 7.5, 100 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.3% NP-40, 40 U/ml of Rnasin ribonuclase inhibitor (Promega, Madison, WI), and a mixture of 10 protease inhibitors provided in the Protease Inhibitors Set (Roche Molecular Biochemicals, Indianapolis, IN).
5 mM MgCl2 : After an additional centrifugation at 10,000 × g for 10 minutes to pellet the mitochondria, aliquots of the supernatant were applied to 15–45% sucrose gradients in 20 mM Tris, 100 mM KCl and 5 mM MgCl2 and centrifuged in a Beckman SW41 rotor at 39,000 rpm for 2 hours at 4°C.
